Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
Chapter 1. County Boundaries

§ 19-1-1.
Adams County.

Adams County is bounded by beginning on the Mississippi River, bounding on Jefferson County, at the upper side of Rose’s old settlement, and thence easterly in a direct line to Strover’s mound, near Fairchild’s creek; thence up the south branch of said creek, with its meanderings, to a place once known as Griffin’s stillhouse, and afterward George Selser’s springs; thence in a direct line to the northeast corner of what was once Edmond Andrews’ cotton gin; thence in a due east course to the basis meridian line; thence south with said line, on Jefferson and Franklin Counties, to the River Homochitto; thence with said river, bounding on Wilkinson County (to leave Tansy Island in Wilkinson County), to the Mississippi River; and thence northerly along the same to the place of beginning. The county site is Natchez.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 20; 1880, § 24; 1892, § 348; 1906, § 411; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3825; 1930, § 3888; 1942, § 3023; Laws, Apr. 2, 1799.

§ 19-1-3.
Alcorn County.

Alcorn County is bounded by beginning on the boundary line between the States of Mississippi and Tennessee, where the line between ranges four and five, east, intersects the same; thence east with said state line to a point two miles east of the line between ranges eight and nine, east; thence south on section lines to the southeast corner of section five, township four, range nine, east; thence west on section lines to the southwest corner of section two, township four, range five, east; thence north on section lines to the line between townships two and three; thence west on said township line to the southwest corner of township two, range five, east; thence north on the line between ranges four and five, east, to the beginning. The county site is Corinth.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 21; 1880, § 25; 1892, § 349; 1906, § 412; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3826; 1930, § 3889; 1942, § 3024; Laws, Apr. 15, 1870.

§ 19-1-5.
Amite County.

Amite County is bounded by beginning on the Homochitto River at the mouth of Foster’s creek; thence up said river, with its meanderings, to the line between townships four and five; thence with said township line east to its intersection with the line between ranges six and seven, east; thence south with said range line to the boundary of Louisiana; thence west on the boundary line to the line between ranges one and two, east; thence north on the range line to Foster’s creek; thence down said creek to the place of beginning. The county site is Liberty.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 22; 1880, § 26; 1892, § 350; 1906, § 413; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3827; 1930, § 3890; 1942, § 3025; Laws, Feb. 24, 1809.

§ 19-1-7.
Attala County.

Attala County is bounded by beginning at the point on Big Black River where the line between townships sixteen and seventeen crosses the same; thence east with said township line to the line between ranges nine and ten, east; thence south to the line between townships twelve and thirteen, being the northeast corner of Leake County; thence west with the line between townships twelve and thirteen to the line between ranges five and six, east; thence south with said range line to the center of township twelve, range five, east; thence due west with sectional lines to the Choctaw boundary; thence southerly on said boundary line one mile; thence west on section lines to Big Black River; thence up said river, with its meanderings, to the beginning. The county site is Kosciusko.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 61; 1871, § 23; 1880, § 27; 1892, § 351; 1906, § 414; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3828; 1930, § 3891; 1942, § 3026; Laws, Dec. 23, 1833.

§ 19-1-9.
Benton County.

Benton County is bounded by beginning at a point on the boundary between the States of Mississippi and Tennessee where it is intersected by the line between ranges one and two, west; thence south on section lines to the southwest corner of section six, township three, range one, west; thence due east on section lines to the southeast corner of section four, township three, range one, west; thence due south on section lines to the southwest corner of section three, township six, range one, west; thence east to the basis meridian; thence north on said meridian line to the line between townships five and six; thence due east on said township line to the southeast corner of section thirty-three, in township five, range two, east; thence due north on section lines to the southeast corner of section sixteen, in township three, range two, east; thence due east on section lines to the southeast corner of section thirteen, township three, range two, east; thence due north on range line between ranges two and three to the southeast corner of township two, range two, east; thence due east on township lines to the southeast corner of section thirty-one, township two, range three, east; thence due north on section lines to the Tennessee state line; thence due west on said state line to the beginning. The county site is Ashland.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 24; 1880, § 28; 1892, § 352; 1906, § 415; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3829; 1930, § 3892; 1942, § 3027; Laws, July 15, 1870.

§ 19-1-11.
Bolivar County.

Bolivar County is bounded by beginning on the Mississippi River, at the center of township twenty-six, north, range seven, west; thence east with said line to the line between ranges four and five, west; thence south on said line to the line between townships twenty and twenty-one; thence west on said township line to the range line between ranges five and six, west; thence south to the township line between townships nineteen and twenty; thence west to the Mississippi River; thence up said river to the beginning. The county sites are Rosedale and Cleveland.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 80; 1871, § 25; 1880, § 29; 1892, § 353; 1906, § 416; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3830; 1930, § 3893; 1942, § 3028; Laws, Feb. 9, 1836.

§ 19-1-13.
Calhoun County.

Calhoun County is bounded by beginning at the northwest corner of section three, township eleven, range three, west; thence east on the township line to the northeast corner of township eleven, range one, west; thence south on the range line to the southeast corner of said township; thence east to the northeast corner of township twelve, range one, east; thence south to the northeast corner of township fifteen, range one, east; thence west to the northwest corner of section three, township fifteen, range one, east; thence south to the southeast corner of township twenty-two, range ten, east; thence west eighteen miles to the southwest corner of township twenty-two, range eight, east; thence north to the beginning. The county site is Pittsboro.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 26; 1880, § 30; 1892, § 354; 1906, § 417; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3831; 1930, § 3894; 1942, § 3029; Laws, Mar. 8, 1852.

§ 19-1-15.
Carroll County.

Carroll County is bounded by beginning at the middle of the Yalobusha River at the point at which a line drawn from the center of township twenty-one, range two, east, would intersect said river; thence east on section lines to the northwest corner of section twenty-one, township twenty-one, range five, east; thence south to the northwest corner of section twenty-one, township eighteen, range five, east; thence east to the northwest corner of section nineteen, township eighteen, range six, east; thence south one mile to the section line; thence east to the northeast corner of section twenty-seven, township eighteen, range six, east; thence south to the southwest corner of section thirty-five, township seventeen, range six, east; thence west to Big Black River; thence with the middle of said river to the northeast corner of Holmes County; thence with the boundary line of Holmes County to the point at which said line is crossed by the line between sections fourteen and fifteen, township seventeen, range one, east; thence north with said section line to the southwest corner of section fourteen, township eighteen, range one, east; thence east to the range line between ranges one and two, east; thence north to the northwest corner of township eighteen, range two, east; thence east to the southeast corner of section thirty-two, township nineteen, range two, east; thence north to the northeast corner of section seventeen, township twenty, range two, east; thence west by section lines to the middle of the Yalobusha River; thence north with the middle of said river to the beginning. The county sites are Carrollton and Vaiden.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 55; 1871, § 27; 1880, § 31; § 1892, § 355; 1906, § 418; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3832; 1930, § 3895; 1942, § 3030; Laws, Dec. 23, 1833.

§ 19-1-17.
Chickasaw County.

Chickasaw County is bounded by beginning at the northwest corner of township twelve, range two, east; thence east to the northeast corner of township twelve, range five, east; thence south on the range line to the northeast corner of township fifteen, range five, east; thence west on the township line to the range line between ranges three and four, east; thence south to the southeast corner of section twenty-four, township fifteen, range three, east; thence west to the northwest corner of section thirty of same township; thence south to the southwest corner of same section; thence west to the northeast corner of section thirty-six, township twenty-two, range ten, east; thence north to the northeast corner of township twenty-two, range ten, east; thence east to the southeast corner of township fourteen, range one, east; thence north to the beginning. The county sites are Houston and Okolona.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 72; 1871, § 28; 1880, § 32; 1892, § 356; 1906, § 419; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3833; 1930, § 3896; 1942, § 3031; Laws, Feb. 9, 1836.

§ 19-1-19.
Choctaw County.

Choctaw County is bounded by beginning at the northeast corner of section twelve, township nineteen, range eleven, east; thence west on section lines to a point where said section line crosses Big Black River; thence down said river by the middle of the stream to where it crosses the line between sections fifteen and sixteen, township eighteen, range eight, east; thence south on said section line to the southwest corner of section thirty-four, township seventeen, range eight, east; thence east on the township line between townships sixteen and seventeen to the northeast corner of township sixteen, range nine, east; thence south on the range line between ranges nine and ten to the southwest corner of township fifteen, range ten, east; thence east on the township line between townships fourteen and fifteen to the southeast corner of township fifteen, range ten, east; thence north on the range line between ranges ten and eleven to the northeast corner of said township fifteen, range ten; thence east to the southeast corner of township sixteen, range eleven, east; thence north on the range line to the northeast corner of said township sixteen, range eleven, east; thence east to the southwest corner of Oktibbeha County-southwest corner of township seventeen, range twelve, east; thence north with the boundary line of Oktibbeha county to the beginning. The county site is Ackerman.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 52; 1871, § 29; 1880, § 33; 1892, § 357; 1906, § 420; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3834; 1930, § 3897; 1942, § 3032; Laws, Dec. 23, 1833.

§ 19-1-21.
Claiborne County.

Claiborne County is bounded by beginning at the junction of the Little Boguesha with the Mississippi River, nearly opposite to Big Black Island, on the southwestern boundary of Warren County; thence with Little Boguesha to the Big Boguesha; thence with Big Boguesha to the Big Black River; thence up said river, with its meanderings, to the old Choctaw boundary, in township fourteen, range five, east; thence south with said Choctaw boundary line to the township line between townships nine and ten, the same being the northeast corner of Jefferson County; and the boundary line between Claiborne and Jefferson Counties is as follows: beginning on the Mississippi River at a point opposite the lower end of the Petit Gulf hills, running thence a direct course to the most northern point of the tract of land formerly known as “Robert Trimble’s,” on Tabor’s creek of Bayou Pierre; continuing the same course until it shall intersect the South Fork of Bayou Pierre, at Elijah L. Clarke’s wagon ford on said creek; thence up said creek to the township line between townships nine and ten; thence along said township line east to the old Choctaw boundary line; and the western boundary line of Claiborne County is the western boundary of the state between said two points of beginning on the Mississippi River. The county site is Port Gibson.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 30; 1880, § 34; 1892, § 358; 1906, § 421; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3835; 1930, § 3898; 1942, § 3033; Laws, Jan. 27, 1802.

§ 19-1-23.
Clarke County.

Clarke County is bounded by beginning on the Choctaw boundary line, where the range line between ranges thirteen and fourteen, east, of the Choctaw meridian extended strikes the same; thence eastwardly with said Choctaw boundary line to the northwest corner of the Hiawanee reserve; thence direct to the northeast corner of said Hiawanee reserve; thence along the said Choctaw boundary line to the Alabama state line; thence nearly due north along said state line to the point where the township line between townships four and five strikes the same; thence west along said township line to the northwest corner of township four, range fourteen, east; thence due south along the range line to the point of beginning. The county site is Quitman.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 49; 1871, § 31; 1880, § 35; 1892, § 359; 1906, § 422; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3836; 1930, § 3899; 1942, § 3034; Laws, Dec. 23, 1833.

§ 19-1-25.
Clay County.

Clay County is bounded by beginning at a point where the section line running east from the northeast corner of section twenty-four, township sixteen, range seven, east intersects the Tombigbee River; thence running due west to the northwest corner of section nineteen, township sixteen, range six, east; thence due north to the northeast corner of township fifteen, range five, east; thence west to the northwest corner of township fifteen, range four, east; thence south to the southwest corner of section nineteen in said township and range (township fifteen, range four, east), thence west to the northwest corner of section thirty, township fifteen, range three, east, and running south along the line between ranges two and three, east, to the intersection of said range line with the old Chicasaw boundary line; thence north, 77.03 east, on said line to the northwest corner of fractional section thirty-five, township twenty-one, range twelve, east; thence south on the sectional line to the southwest corner of section twenty-six, township twenty, range twelve, east; thence to the northeast corner of Oktibbeha County; thence south along the boundary of Oktibbeha County to the southwest corner of section eighteen, township nineteen, range sixteen, east; thence east to the southwest corner of section fourteen, township nineteen, range sixteen, east, to Catalpa creek; thence down the meanderings of said creek to its junction with Tibbie creek; thence down the meanderings of Tibbie creek to its junction with the Tombigbee River at the southeast corner of section thirty-five, township seventeen, range seven, east; thence following the meanderings of said river to the beginning. The county site is West Point.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 33; 1880, § 36; 1892, § 360; 1906, § 423; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3837; 1930, § 3900; 1942, § 3035; Laws, May 12, 1871.

§ 19-1-27.
Coahoma County.

Coahoma County is bounded by beginning where the Choctaw and Chickasaw boundary intersects the Mississippi River; thence southerly with said boundary line to its intersection with the line between townships twenty-nine and thirty; thence south with the section lines to the northeast corner of section thirty-three, township twenty-eight, range two west; thence west on section lines to the range line between ranges two and three west; thence south on the range line to the southwest corner of township twenty-five, range two west; thence west with the line between townships twenty-four and twenty-five to the southwest corner of township twenty-five, range four west; thence north on the line between ranges four and five west to the northeast corner of section twenty-four, township twenty-six, range five west; thence west on sectional lines to the Mississippi River; thence up said river to the beginning. The county site is Clarksdale.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 79; 1871, § 32; 1880, § 37; 1892, § 361; 1906, § 424; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3838; 1930, § 3901; 1942, § 3036; Laws, Feb. 9, 1836; Laws, 1976, ch. 316, eff from and after passage (approved March 31, 1976).

§ 19-1-29.
Copiah County.

Copiah County is bounded by beginning where the line between townships two and three intersects the old Choctaw boundary; thence east on said township line to Pearl River; thence down said river, with its meanderings, to the old Choctaw boundary; thence southwesterly with said boundary line to the line between townships eight and nine; thence west with said township line to the northeast corner of section three, township eight, range eight, east; thence south to the southeast corner of said section; thence west to the southwest corner of section four of said township; thence north to the line between townships eight and nine; thence west to the Choctaw boundary line; thence northerly with said boundary line to the beginning. The county site is Hazlehurst.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 24; 1871, § 34; 1880, § 38; 1892, § 362; 1906, § 425; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3839; 1930, § 3902; 1942, § 3037; Laws, Jan. 21, 1823.

§ 19-1-31.
Covington County.

Covington County is bounded as follows: Beginning at the southwest corner of section thirty-five, township six, north, range sixteen west; thence due north along section lines to Bowie creek; thence northwestwardly up the middle or thread of said creek to where the same crosses the line between townships seven and eight; thence due west along said township line to the line between ranges seventeen and eighteen, west; thence due north on said range line to the old Choctaw boundary line; thence north of east with said boundary line to the northeast corner of section thirty-three, township ten, range fourteen, west; thence south on section lines to the township line between townships five and six; thence west with said township line to the beginning. The county site is Collins.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 35; 1880, § 39; 1892, § 363; 1906, § 426; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3840; 1930, § 3903; 1942, § 3038; Laws, Jan. 5, 1819.

§ 19-1-33.
De Soto County.

De Soto County is bounded by beginning where the northern boundary of the state intersects the Mississippi River; thence east with said boundary line to the center of range five, west; thence south with the section lines through the center of said range to the southeast corner of section thirty-two, township three, range five, west; thence west on the township line between townships three and four to where said line intersects Coldwater River; thence down, with the meanderings of said river, to where the range line between ranges nine and ten intersects said river; thence north along said range line to the lines between townships two and three, range nine, west; thence west with said township line to the Mississippi River; thence up said river to the beginning. The county site is Hernando.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 75; 1871, § 36; 1880, § 40; 1892, § 364; 1906, § 427; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3841; 1930, § 3904; 1942, § 3039; Laws, Feb. 9, 1836.

§ 19-1-35.
Forrest County.

Forrest County is bounded as follows: Beginning at the northeast corner of township five, north, of range twelve, west, of St. Stephen’s meridian, then run south along the line dividing ranges eleven and twelve to the southeast corner of township one, south, of range twelve, west; then run west along the line of Stone County to the southwest corner of township one, south, of range thirteen, west; then run north along the lines of Pearl River and Lamar Counties to the southeast corner of township five, north, of range fourteen, west; then run west along the line of Lamar County to the southwest corner of said last named township; then run north along the line of Lamar County to the northwest corner of said last named township; then run east along the lines of Covington and Jones Counties to the point of beginning. The county site is Hattiesburg.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 3842; 1930, § 3205; 1942, § 3040; Laws, 1906, ch. 165.

§ 19-1-37.
Franklin County.

Franklin County is bounded by beginning at the northwest corner of township seven, range one, east; thence east with the township line to a point one mile east of the range line between ranges five and six, east; thence south on the section line, one mile from said range line, to the township line between townships four and five; thence west with said township line to the Homochitto River; thence down, with the meanderings of said river, to the basis meridian line; thence north on said meridian line to the beginning. The county site is Meadville.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 37; 1880, § 41; 1892, § 365; 1906, § 428; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3844; 1930, § 3906; 1942, 3041; Laws, Dec. 21, 1809.

§ 19-1-39.
George County.

George County is bounded as follows, to wit: Beginning at the northwest corner of section six, township one, south, range eight, west; and from thence running south along the line of Perry County to a point dividing township one, south and township two, south; thence running west along said township line to the northwest corner of section three, township two, south, range nine, west; thence south along the lines of Stone County to a point dividing township three, south, and township four, south, and from thence run east along the lines dividing township three, south, and township four, south, to the Mississippi and Alabama state line; thence run north along said state line to the thirty-first parallel of latitude which is the same as a point dividing township one, south, and township one, north; thence run west along said township line back to the place of beginning. The county site is Lucedale.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 3845; 1930, § 3907; 1942, § 3042; Laws, 1910, ch. 248.

§ 19-1-41.
Greene County.

Greene County is bounded by beginning at the northwest corner of township five, north, range eight, west; thence east on the township line to the intersection of the state line with Alabama; thence southerly with said state line to the thirty-first parallel of latitude which is the township line between townships one north and one south; thence west with said township line to the line between ranges eight and nine, west; thence north with said range line to the beginning. The county site is Leakesville.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 38; 1880, § 42; 1892, § 366; 1906, § 429; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3847; 1930, § 3908; 1942, § 3043; Laws, Dec. 9, 1811.

§ 19-1-43.
Grenada County.

Grenada County is bounded by beginning at the northwest corner of township twenty-two, range two, east; thence east with the township line to the southwest corner of section thirty-four, in township twenty-three, range three, east; thence north with the section lines to the northwest corner of said section; thence east with the section lines to the line between ranges three and four, east; thence north with said range line to the township line between townships twenty-three and twenty-four; thence east with said township line to the northwest corner of section three, in township twenty-three, range five, east; thence south to the southwest corner of section ten, in the last named township; thence east with the section line to the range line between ranges seven and eight, east; thence south with said range line to the southeast corner of section thirteen, township twenty-one, range seven, east; thence west with the section lines to the southwest corner of section eighteen, township twenty-one, north, range two, east; thence north on the range line, between ranges one and two, east, to the beginning. The county site is Grenada.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 39; 1880, § 43; 1892, § 367; 1906, § 430; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3848; 1930, § 3909; 1942, § 3044; Laws, May 9, 1870.

§ 19-1-45.
Hancock County.

Hancock County is bounded as follows: Beginning at the southeast corner of township four, south, range fourteen, west, and thence west to the southeast corner of township four, south, range sixteen, west; thence south on the range line nine miles to the southeast corner of section thirteen, township six, south of range sixteen, west; thence west to the northeast corner of section twenty-one, township six, south, of range sixteen, west; thence south to the southeast corner of said section twenty-one, township six, south, of range sixteen, west; thence west to the northwest corner of section thirty, township six, south, of range sixteen, west; thence south along range line between range sixteen and range seventeen to the southeast corner of section one, township seven, south, of range seventeen, west; thence west to Pearl River; thence down said river by the middle thereof to the most eastern junction of said river with Lake Borgne and thence south to the southern boundary of the state; thence eastwardly with said boundary including all islands within six leagues of the shores of the Gulf of Mexico and Lake Borgne to a point due south of the middle of the entrance of the Bay of St. Louis, thence north to the middle of said entrance; thence northwardly along the middle of the Bay of St. Louis to the range line between ranges thirteen and fourteen, thence north along said range line to the point of beginning. The county site is Bay St. Louis.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 40; 1880, § 44; 1892, § 368; 1906, § 431; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3849; 1930, § 3910; 1942, § 3045; Laws, Dec. 14, 1812.

§ 19-1-47.
Harrison County.

Harrison County is bounded by beginning at the southeast corner of section twenty-one, township four, south, range nine, west; thence due south through the middle of said range nine to the middle of the Bay of Biloxi; thence along the middle of said Bay of Biloxi to its entrance at the east end of Deer Island; thence due south to the southern boundary of the State of Mississippi on the Gulf of Mexico; thence westwardly along said boundary to a point from which a line due north strikes the middle of the Bay of St. Louis; including all the islands within six leagues of the shore of the Gulf of Mexico; thence due north to the entrance of said bay; thence along the middle of said Bay of St. Louis northwardly to a point from whence the point at which the line between ranges fourteen and thirteen comes to said bay bears due north; thence due north to the southwest corner of section thirty-one, township four, south, range thirteen, west; thence east to the southeast corner of section thirty-six, township four, south, range thirteen, west; thence north to the northeast corner of section twenty-five, township four, south range thirteen, west, thence east to the point of beginning. The county sites are Gulfport and Biloxi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 88; 1871, § 41; 1880, § 45; 1892, § 369; 1906, § 432; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3851; 1930, § 3911; 1942, § 3046; Laws, Feb. 5, 1841.

§ 19-1-49.
Hinds County.

Hinds County is bounded by beginning at a point on Big Black River where the line between ranges two and three, west, intersects said river; thence south on said range line to the lines between townships seven and eight; thence east on said township line to the Choctaw basis meridian; thence south on said meridian line to the line between townships six and seven; thence east on said township line to Pearl River; thence down said river, with its meanderings, to the line between townships two and three; thence west with said township line to the old Choctaw boundary line; thence north on said Choctaw boundary line to Big Black River; thence up said river, with the meanderings thereof, to the beginning. The county sites are Jackson and Raymond.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 19; 1871, § 42; 1880, § 46; 1892, § 370; 1906, § 433; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3852; 1930, § 3912; 1942, § 3047; Laws, Feb. 12, 1821.

§ 19-1-51.
Holmes County.

Holmes County is bounded by beginning in the Yazoo River where it is intersected by the township line between townships seventeen and eighteen, range one, west; thence running southeasterly by the “Gum Corners” to Big Black River, in township sixteen, range five, east; thence down said river, with its meanderings, to Boles’ ferry, in section twenty-two, township twelve, range three, east; thence northwesterly in a direct line to where the township line between townships thirteen and fourteen crosses the Yazoo River; thence in a northwestwardly direction with the meanders of Yazoo River and along its center line to its intersection with the center line of Tchula Lake; thence with the meanderings of Tchula Lake and along its center line to its intersection with the line between sections nineteen and twenty, township fifteen, north, range one, west; thence north along the section lines to the center line of the Yazoo River; thence up said river to the beginning. The county site is Lexington.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 45; 1871, § 43; 1880, § 47; 1892, § 371; 1906, § 434; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3853; 1930, § 3913; 1942, § 3048; Laws, Feb. 19, 1823.

§ 19-1-53.
Humphreys County.

Humphreys County is bounded as follows: Beginning at the intersection of the center line of Sunflower River with the township line between townships sixteen and seventeen; thence in a southerly direction with the meanders of Sunflower River and along its center line to its intersection with the township line between townships fourteen and fifteen; thence east along said line to the northeast corner of township fourteen, north, range five, west; thence south along the east boundary lines of township fourteen, north, range five, west and township thirteen, north, range five, west, to the southwest corner of township thirteen, north, range four, west; thence east along the south boundary line of township thirteen, north, range four, west, and township thirteen, north, range three, west to the southeast corner of township thirteen, north, range three, west; thence north along the east line of said township thirteen, north, range three, west, to the northeast corner of the same; thence east along the south line of township fourteen, north, range two, west, to the southwest corner of section thirty-six, township fourteen, north, range two, west; thence north along the line between sections thirty-five and thirty-six, township fourteen, north, range two, west, to the center line of the Yazoo River; thence in a northwesterly direction with the meanders of the Yazoo River and along its center line to its intersection with the center line of Tchula Lake; thence with the meanders of Tchula Lake and along its center line to its intersection with the line between sections nineteen and twenty, township fifteen, north, range one, west; thence north along the section lines to the center line of the Yazoo River; thence in a southwesterly direction with the meanders of the Yazoo River and along its center line to the Choctaw boundary line; thence in a northwestly direction along the Choctaw boundary line to its intersection with the east line of township sixteen, north, range three, west; thence north along said township line and along the east line of township seventeen, north, range three, west, to the northeast corner of section thirteen, township seventeen, north, range three, west; thence west along the section lines to the northwest corner of section eighteen, township seventeen, north, range three, west; thence south along the west boundary line of township seventeen, north, range three, west to the township line between townships sixteen and seventeen; thence west along said boundary line to the point of beginning. Said description above embraces portions of Washington, Yazoo, Holmes, Sharkey and Sunflower Counties. The county site is Belzoni.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp § 3853a; 1930, § 3914; 1942, § 3049; Laws, 1918, ch. 348.

§ 19-1-55.
Issaquena County.

Issaquena County is bounded by beginning at the northwest corner of section three, township thirteen, range seven, west; thence along the township line between townships thirteen and fourteen, west, to the western boundary of the state; thence southerly along the western boundary of the state to the northwest corner of Warren County; thence east along said county line to the southwest corner of township nine, range seven, west; thence south along the range line between ranges two and three to the Yazoo River; thence along the Yazoo River to the range line between ranges three and four, east; thence north along said range line to the southwest corner of township nine, range six, west; thence east along the boundary of Warren County to Big Sunflower River; thence up said river to the southern boundary of township ten, range five, west; thence west along the township line between townships nine and ten to the northwest corner of township nine, range seven, west; thence along the western boundary of Sharkey County to the beginning. The county site is Mayersville.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 44; 1880, § 48; 1892, § 372; 1906, § 435; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3854; 1930, § 3915; 1942, § 3050; Laws, Jan. 23, 1844.

§ 19-1-57.
Itawamba County.

Itawamba County is bounded by beginning at the southwest corner of section fourteen, township seven, range seven, east; thence east by section lines to the boundary line between the States of Mississippi and Alabama; thence southerly on said state boundary to a point one mile north of the line between townships eleven and twelve; thence west by section lines to the southwest corner of section twenty-six, township eleven, range seven, east; thence north by section lines to the point of beginning. The county site is Fulton.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2 art 69; 1871, § 45; 1880, § 49; 1892, § 373; 1906, § 436; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3855; 1930, § 3916; 1942, § 3051; Laws, Feb. 9, 1836.

§ 19-1-59.
Jackson County.

Jackson County is bounded by beginning at the northwest corner of section three, township four, south, range nine west; thence due south through the middle of said range nine to middle of the Bay of Biloxi, thence along the middle of said Bay of Biloxi to its entrance at the east end of Deer Island; thence due south to the southern boundary of the State of Mississippi on the Gulf of Mexico; thence eastwardly along said boundary, including all the islands within six leagues of the shore of the Gulf of Mexico, to the boundary lines between the States of Alabama and Mississippi, thence northwardly along the said boundary line to the point where the township line between townships three and four, south, intersect said state boundary line; thence west along said township line between townships three and four, south, to the point of beginning. The county site is Pascagoula.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 46; 1880, § 50; 1892, § 374; 1906, § 437; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3856; 1930, § 3917; 1942, § 3052; Laws, Dec. 14, 1812.

§ 19-1-61.
Jasper County.

Jasper County is bounded by beginning at the northwest corner of township four, range ten, east; thence east on the line between townships four and five, north, to the line between ranges thirteen and fourteen, east; thence south on said range line to the Choctaw boundary line; thence westerly on said boundary line to the line between ranges nine and ten, east; thence north on said range line to the beginning. The county sites are Paulding and Bay Springs.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 56; 1871, § 47; 1880, § 51; 1892, § 375; 1906, § 438; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3857; 1930, § 3918; 1942, § 3053; Laws, Dec. 3, 1823.

§ 19-1-63.
Jefferson County.

Jefferson County is bounded by beginning on the Mississippi River at the southwestern corner of Claiborne County, and thence along the southern boundary of Claiborne County to the Choctaw boundary line; thence south with said boundary to where it crosses the line between townships seven and eight; thence west on said township line to the basis meridian of the Washington district; thence north on said meridian line to the northeast corner of Adams County, at a point due east from the point being the northeast corner of where Edmond Andrews’ cotton gin once was; thence due west to such point; thence westerly in a direct line to what was known and called “George Selser’s Spring,” on the south branch of Fairchild’s creek; thence down such south branch to Strover’s mound, so-called; thence westerly in a direct line to the upper side of Rose’s old settlement, on the Mississippi River; thence up said river to the beginning. The county site is Fayette.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 48; 1880, § 52; 1892, § 376; 1906, § 439; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3858; 1930, § 3919; 1942, § 3054; Laws, Jan. 11, 1802.

§ 19-1-65.
Jefferson Davis County.

Jefferson Davis County is bounded as follows: Beginning at the southeast corner of section thirty-four, township six, north, of range sixteen; thence due north along section line to Bowie creek; thence northwestwardly up the middle or thread of said creek to where the same crosses the line between townships seven and eight; thence due west along said township line to the line between ranges seventeen and eighteen, west; thence due north along said range line to the old Choctaw boundary line; thence westwardly along the old Choctaw boundary line to a point where the same is intersected by the line between sections eleven and twelve, in township nine, north, of range twenty, west; thence due south along section lines to the line between townships six and seven, range twenty, west; thence due east along said township line one mile to the range line between ranges nineteen and twenty, west; thence due south to the southwest corner of section eighteen, township five, north, range nineteen, west; thence east to the southwest corner of section sixteen, township five, north, range eighteen, west; thence north to the township line between townships five and six, north, and thence east to the point of beginning. The county site is Prentiss.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 3859; 1930, § 3920; 1942, § 3055; Laws, 1906, ch. 166.

§ 19-1-67.
Jones County.

Jones County is bounded by beginning at the point where the Choctaw boundary line crosses the center of range fourteen, west; thence easterly on said Choctaw boundary line to the line between ranges nine and ten, west; thence south with said range line to the township line between townships five and six; thence west with said township line to the center of range fourteen, west; thence north with the section lines, in the center of said range, to the beginning. The county sites are Ellisville and Laurel.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 31; 1871, § 49; 1880, § 53; 1892, § 377; 1906, § 440; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3860; 1930, § 3921; 1942, § 3056; Laws, Jan. 24, 1826.